Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 1
FIRE, POLICE, OR STREET DEPARTMENT - PAID - CIVIL SERVICE

31-30-101. Authority to provide for classified departments.

The governing body of any city or town may provide by ordinance for a paid fire department, a paid police department, or a paid street department or all of same and may fix, define, and classify the various grades of employment in such departments, which grades and classifications shall be based upon the nature of the services to be rendered and the duties to be performed and shall also fix uniform wages and salaries to be paid to all employees in each particular class, which wages may be lowered or increased uniformly for each class from time to time.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1212, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-30-101 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-30-102. Civil service commission - withdrawal.

The governing body of any city or town in the state maintaining a paid police department, a paid fire department, or a paid street department may establish a commission which shall be known as "the city (town) of .... fire and police and street department civil service commission". Said governing body shall not have the authority to withdraw said departments from operation of such system unless and until the withdrawal thereof has been submitted to the registered electors of said city or town at a special or regular election held in said city or town pursuant to an ordinance properly passed submitting the same to said electors and has been approved by not less than a majority vote of said electors voting on such proposition.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1213, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-30-102 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-30-103. Purpose.

It is the intent of this part 1 to enable the governing body of any city or town within this state to adopt by ordinance such civil service system for fire, police, or street departments as may be adaptable to the size and type of city or town involved and consist of a comprehensive civil service system as in the sound discretion of said governing body may be for the best interests of the public service in said city or town. The provisions of this part 1 shall not apply to or in any way annul, repeal, or set aside the civil service provisions in force on or before May 17, 1939, in any city or town.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1213, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-30-103 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-30-104. Contract for conducting examination.

The governing body of any city or town may contract with the governing body of any municipality or county within this state or with any department of the state for the conducting of competitive examinations to ascertain the fitness of applicants for positions and employment in the fire, police, or street department or all of same and for the performance of any other service in connection with personnel selection and administration.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1213, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-30-104 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-30-105. Ordinance - violation.

Any ordinance adopted by the governing body of any city or town under the provisions of this part 1 shall include the following provisions and penalty for violation thereof: No person holding an office or place in a fire, police, or street department placed by the governing body under a civil service system pursuant to the provisions of this part 1 shall seek or accept election, nomination, or appointment as an officer of a political club or organization; take an active part in a county or municipal political campaign; serve as a member of a committee of such club, organization, or circle; seek signatures to any petition provided for by any law; act as a worker at the polls; or distribute badges, pamphlets, dodgers, or handbills of any kind favoring or opposing any candidate for election or for nomination to a public office, whether county or municipal. Nothing in this part 1 shall prevent any such officer or employee from becoming or continuing to be a member of a political club or organization, attending a political meeting, or enjoying entire freedom from all interference in casting his vote.

Any willful violation of this section or violation through culpable negligence is sufficient grounds to authorize the discharge of any firefighter, police officer, or street department employee.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1213, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 1027, § 58, effective August 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-30-105 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-30-106. Police to provide identification cards to retired peace officers upon request - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Peace officer" means a certified peace officer described in section 16-2.5-102, C.R.S.

"Photographic identification" means a photographic identification that satisfies the description at 18 U.S.C. sec. 926C (d).

Except as described in subsection (3) of this section, on and after August 7, 2013, if a police department of a city or town has a policy, on August 7, 2013, of issuing photographic identification to peace officers who have retired from the police department, and the police department discontinues said policy after August 7, 2013, the police department shall continue to provide such photographic identification to peace officers who have retired from the police department if:

The peace officer requests the identification;

The peace officer retired from the police department before the date upon which the police department discontinued the policy; and

The peace officer is a qualified retired law enforcement officer, as defined in 18 U.S.C. sec. 926C (c).

Before issuing or renewing a photographic identification to a retired law enforcement officer pursuant to this section, a law enforcement agency of the state shall complete a criminal background check of the officer through a search of the national instant criminal background check system created by the federal "Brady Handgun Violence Prevention Act", Pub.L. 103-159, the relevant portion of which is codified at 18 U.S.C. sec. 922 (t), and a search of the state integrated criminal justice information system. If the background check indicates that the officer is prohibited from possessing a firearm by state or federal law, the law enforcement agency shall not issue the photographic identification.

The police department may charge a fee for issuing a photographic identification to a retired peace officer pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, which fee shall not exceed the direct and indirect costs assumed by the police department in issuing the photographic identification.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, a police department shall not be required to issue a photographic identification to a particular peace officer if the chief administrative officer of the police department elects not to do so.

If a police department denies a photographic identification to a retired peace officer who requests a photographic identification pursuant to this section, the police department shall provide the retired peace officer a written statement setting forth the reason for the denial.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1118), ch. 81, p. 259, § 4, effective August 7.

31-30-107. Disclosure of knowing misrepresentation by a peace officer required - disclosure waivers - reports - definitions.

Subject to the limitations of this section, a municipal police department or town marshal's office that employs, employed, or deputized on or after January 1, 2010, a peace officer who applies for employment with another Colorado law enforcement agency shall disclose to the hiring agency information, if available, indicating whether the peace officer's employment history included any instances in which the peace officer had a sustained violation for making a knowing misrepresentation:

In any testimony or affidavit relating to the arrest or prosecution of a person or to a civil case pertaining to the peace officer or to the peace officer's employment history; or

During the course of any internal investigation by a law enforcement agency, which investigation is related to the peace officer's alleged criminal conduct; official misconduct, as described in section 18-8-404 or 18-8-405, C.R.S.; or use of excessive force, regardless of whether the alleged criminal conduct, official misconduct, or use of excessive force occurred while the peace officer was on duty, off duty, or acting pursuant to a service contract to which the peace officer's employing agency is a party.

The disclosure described in subsection (1) of this section is required only upon the presentation of a written waiver to a municipal police department or town marshal's office, which waiver explicitly authorizes the municipal police department or town marshal's office to disclose the information described in said subsection (1), has been signed by the applicant peace officer, and identifies the Colorado law enforcement agency that is considering the applicant peace officer for employment. A municipal police department or town marshal's office that receives such a waiver shall provide the disclosure to the Colorado law enforcement agency that is considering the applicant peace officer for employment not more than seven days after such receipt.

A municipal police department or town marshal's office is not required to provide the disclosure described in subsection (1) of this section if the police department or town marshal's office is prohibited from providing such disclosure pursuant to a binding nondisclosure agreement to which the police department or town marshal's office is a party, which agreement was executed before August 5, 2015.

A municipal police department or town marshal's office shall notify the local district attorney whenever the municipal police department or town marshal's office learns that any peace officer of the municipal police department or town marshal's office has made a knowing misrepresentation:

In any testimony or affidavit relating to the arrest or prosecution of a person or to a civil case pertaining to the peace officer or to the peace officer's employment history; or

During the course of any internal investigation by a law enforcement agency, which investigation is related to the peace officer's alleged criminal conduct; official misconduct, as described in section 18-8-404 or 18-8-405, C.R.S.; or use of excessive force, regardless of whether the alleged criminal conduct, official misconduct, or use of excessive force occurred while the peace officer was on duty, off duty, or acting pursuant to a service contract to which the peace officer's employing agency is a party.

A municipal police department or town marshal's office shall provide the notice described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) not more than seven days after the municipal police department or town marshal's office learns that a peace officer of the municipal police department or town marshal's office has made a knowing misrepresentation, as described in said paragraph (a).

A municipal police department or town marshal's office is not liable for complying with the provisions of this section.

As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise, "state or local law enforcement agency" means:

The Colorado state patrol created pursuant to section 24-33.5-201, C.R.S.;

The Colorado bureau of investigation created pursuant to section 24-33.5-401, C.R.S.;

A county sheriff's office;

A municipal police department;

The division of parks and wildlife within the department of natural resources created pursuant to section 24-1-124, C.R.S.; or

A town marshal's office.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (SB 15-218), ch. 209, p. 763, § 4, effective August 5.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 15-218, see section 1 of chapter 209, Session Laws of Colorado 2015.

31-30-108. Peace officer hiring - required use of waiver - definitions.

A municipal police department or town marshal's office shall require each candidate that it interviews for a peace officer position who has been employed by another law enforcement agency or governmental agency to execute a written waiver that explicitly authorizes each law enforcement agency or governmental agency that has employed the candidate to disclose the applicant's files, including internal affairs files, to the municipal police department or town marshal's office interviewing the candidate and releases the interviewing agency and each law enforcement agency or governmental agency that employed the candidate from any liability related to the use and disclosure of the files. A law enforcement agency or governmental agency may disclose the applicant's files by either providing copies or allowing the municipal police department or town marshal's office to review the files at the law enforcement agency's office or governmental agency's office. A candidate who refuses to execute the waiver shall not be considered for employment by the department or office. The department or office interviewing the candidate shall, at least twenty-one days prior to making the hiring decision, submit the waiver to each law enforcement agency or governmental agency that has employed the candidate. A state or local law enforcement agency or governmental agency that receives such a waiver shall provide the disclosure to the municipal police department or town marshal's office that is interviewing the candidate not more than twenty-one days after such receipt.

A state or local law enforcement agency is not required to provide the disclosures described in subsection (1) of this section if the agency is prohibited from providing the disclosure pursuant to a binding nondisclosure agreement to which the agency is a party, which agreement was executed before June 10, 2016.

A state or local law enforcement agency or governmental agency is not liable for complying with the provisions of this section or participating in an official oral interview with an investigator regarding the candidate.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Files" means all performance reviews, any other files related to job performance, administrative files, grievances, previous personnel applications, personnel-related claims, disciplinary actions, and all complaints, early warnings, and commendations, but does not include nonperformance or conduct-related data, including medical files, schedules, pay and benefit information, or similar administrative data or information.

"State or local law enforcement agency" means:

The Colorado state patrol created pursuant to section 24-33.5-201, C.R.S.;

The Colorado bureau of investigation created pursuant to section 24-33.5-401, C.R.S.;

A county sheriff's office;

A municipal police department;

The division of parks and wildlife within the department of natural resources created pursuant to section 24-1-124, C.R.S.; or

A town marshal's office.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (HB 16-1262), ch. 339, p. 1384, § 4, effective June 10.

31-30-109. Behavioral health professionals - grant applications encouraged - definition - repeal.

Each municipal police department is encouraged to adopt a policy whereby mental health professionals, to the extent practicable, provide:

On-scene response services to support officers' handling of persons with mental health disorders; and

Counseling services to officers of the police department.

In implementing a policy as described in subsection (1) of this section, a municipal police department shall not require a mental health professional to counsel both a person with a mental health disorder and an officer if, in the judgment of the mental health professional, doing so would constitute a conflict of interest or a breach of a professional code of ethics.

For the purposes of this section, each municipal police department is encouraged to apply annually for a grant from the peace officers behavioral health support and community partnerships grant program created in section 24-32-3501.

As used in this section, "mental health professional" means a mental health professional licensed to practice medicine pursuant to article 240 of title 12 or a person licensed as a mental health professional pursuant to article 245 of title 12.

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2027.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1215), ch. 150, p. 507, § 2, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(4) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1719, § 218, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (HB 21-1030), ch. 354, p. 2306, § 4, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1030, see section 1 of chapter 354, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.